src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-gallgat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gallgat: # Verb 'shall'
     gallgat+V+Inf: gallgat
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: galgav
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: galga
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gallga
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: gillgin
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: gallgabehtin #, gallgabähtten]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [gallgaba, gallgaban]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: gallgap
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: gallgabehtit #, gallgabähttet]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gillgi

     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gillgiv
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gillgi
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [galgaj, gilgij]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [galgajmen, gilgijmen]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [galgajden, gilgijden]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [galgajga, galgajgan, gilgijga, gilgijgan]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [galgajme, gilgijme]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [galgajde, gilgijde]
     gallgat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gillgin

     gallgat+V+Imprt+Sg2: galga
     gallgat+V+Imprt+Du2: gallgen
     gallgat+V+Imprt+Pl2: gillgit

#     gallgat+V+Pot+Sg1: gillgitjav
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Sg2: gillgitja
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Sg3: gillgitj
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Du1: gillgitjin
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Du2: gillgitjähppen]
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Du3: gillgitjiebá
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Pl1: gillgitjip
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Pl2: gillgitjihpit
#     gallgat+V+Pot+Pl3: gillgitji

     gallgat+V+ConNeg: galga 
     gallgat+V+GerI: galgadin 
#     gallgat+V+Sup: galgatjit
#     gallgat+V+Vabe: gallgak  
     gallgat+V+VGen: galga 
     gallgat+V+GerII: gallgamin
     gallgat+V+PrfPrc: gallgam
#     gallgat+V+PrsPrc: gallga 
#     gallgat+V+Vsubst: gallgam
